California, session 20252026, AB1030.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 27061 of the Government Code is amended to read:27061. The treasurer shall settle their accounts relating to the collection, care, and disbursement of public revenue of whatsoever nature and kind with the auditor no less frequently than monthly. Upon the request of the auditor, the treasurer shall provide a settlement of cash receipts and disbursements of the prior calendar month to the auditor on or before 10 12 business days after the treasurer receives the auditor’s request.